Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
19-1-115.5. Placement of children out of home - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that the number of children in out-of-home placement has increased significantly. The general assembly further finds that the facility in which a child is placed out of home is often not located in the same school district
as the child's school district of residence. Nevertheless, the general assembly finds that, under the provisions of the "Public School Finance Act of 1994", article 54 of title 22, C.R.S., children in foster home
placement are considered residents of the school district in which the foster home is located. Accordingly, the school district in which the child is placed must accommodate the child and provide the child with
the necessary educational services that serve the child's best interests while absorbing the costs associated with such services within the constraints of the school district's existing budget. The general assembly
finds that in many circumstances it is not possible to meet the best interests of the child in out-of-home placement and the needs of other children enrolled in the school district within the confines of the district's
budget. (1) (a) (I) The general assembly hereby finds that the number of children in out-of-home placement has increased significantly. The general assembly further finds that the facility in which a child is placed
out of home is often not located in the same school district as the child's school district of residence. Nevertheless, the general assembly finds that, under the provisions of the "Public School Finance Act of
1994", article 54 of title 22, C.R.S., children in foster home placement are considered residents of the school district in which the foster home is located. Accordingly, the school district in which the child is
placed must accommodate the child and provide the child with the necessary educational services that serve the child's best interests while absorbing the costs associated with such services within the constraints
of the school district's existing budget. The general assembly finds that in many circumstances it is not possible to meet the best interests of the child in out-of-home placement and the needs of other children
enrolled in the school district within the confines of the district's budget.

The general assembly determines that the number of children in out-of-home placement and the severity of their attendant needs are increasing. The ability to meet the needs of the children in out-of-home placement is frequently restricted by the limited
resources available to a school district. Furthermore, the general assembly finds that there is a disproportionately larger number of children in out-of-home placement in some school districts than in others, thereby
directly impacting the ability of certain school districts to effectively manage and finance the provision of quality educational services to all students in those districts.

The general assembly therefore determines that it would serve the best interests of all children enrolled in a school district if the number of children placed in out-of-home placement facilities by county departments of human or social services in each
of the various school districts is monitored so that the financial impact on all school districts throughout the state is manageable and equitable and so that the best interests of all children, whether or not in out-of-home
placement, can be served.

Contingent upon implementation of the children, youth, and families automation project in the department of human services, the department shall make the following information available to all county departments throughout the state:

Vacancies in out-of-home placement facilities within each county;

The number of out-of-home placement children enrolled in each school district in relation to the total number of students enrolled in the school district;

A list of all out-of-home placement facilities in each school district; and

To the extent known and within available resources, a list of the types of services available in each school district to meet the special needs of children in out-of-home placement.

In every proceeding pursuant to this title in which the court contemplates placing a child out of home, the county department shall make recommendations to the court concerning the proposed placement. Such recommendations shall include information about
placement facilities that are most able to serve appropriately the best interests of the child. In making its recommendations to the court, the county department shall consider:

The special needs, if any, of the child to be placed, including the ability of the proposed out-of-home placement facility and the school district in which the proposed out-of-home placement facility is located to provide the necessary services to meet
those needs;

The proximity of the proposed out-of-home placement facility to the child's parents' home, if parental rights have not been terminated;

Whether the proposed placement facility is in the same school district as the child's parents' residence;

If the proposed placement facility is not in the same school district as the child's parents' residence and if the information is available through the children, youth, and families automation project, the number of children placed out of home by the
court who are already enrolled in the school district in which the proposed out-of-home placement facility is located.

If the recommendation of the county department is to place the child in a placement facility that is not located in the same school district as the child's parents' residence, the placing county department shall inform the school district in which the
child's parents reside of the recommended placement.

In placing a child out of home, the court shall consider the recommendations of the county department and any information it may have concerning whether the child's educational needs can be met adequately if the child is placed in an out-of-home placement
facility located in a school district other than the district in which the child's parents reside.

Upon entry of the court's order placing a child in an out-of-home placement facility located in a school district other than the school district in which the child's parents reside, the county department shall advise the school district in which the child's
parents reside of the court's order.

When a school district is advised by the county department that a child residing in that school district is to be placed in an out-of-home placement facility in another school district pursuant to a court order, the school district shall contact the school
district in which the child is to be placed concerning:

The special educational needs, if any, of the child; and

The resources necessary to meet those special needs.

The state board of education shall provide the department of human services with all aggregate, nonidentifying information concerning student enrollment in every school district in the state that the department of human services may request for purposes
of implementing this section.

Source:

L. 97:
Entire section added, p. 147, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
(1)(b) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 408, § 30, effective August 8.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-1-115.7. Foster care prevention services - provision of services - rights and remedies - exchange of information.

A county department of human or social services may provide both child welfare and prevention services, including but not limited to foster care prevention services, as defined in section 19-1-103, to families, kin caregivers, children, juveniles, and
youth.

Nothing in this section affects any existing rights of a child, juvenile, or youth or a parent or legal guardian.

When prevention services information is exchanged between state agencies, county departments, and service providers to allow for the provision of prevention services, such information is confidential and not available to the public. Any entities providing
prevention services shall ensure that all information obtained and exchanged is confidential as required pursuant to this section, sections 19-1-103 and 19-1-307, and any other applicable state or federal law.

Source:

L. 2020:
Entire section added, (SB 20-162), ch. 221, p. 1090, § 4, effective July 2.

L. 2021:
(1) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 729, § 67, effective October 1.

19-1-116. Funding - alternatives to placement out of the home - services to prevent continued involvement in child welfare system.

The state department of human services shall reimburse allowable expenses to county departments of human or social services for foster care. The state department's budget request for foster care must be based upon the actual aggregate expenditure of federal,
state, and local funds of all counties during the preceding twenty-four months on foster care. Special purpose funds, not to exceed five percent of the total appropriation for foster care, must be retained by the state department
of human services for purposes of meeting emergencies and contingencies in individual counties. The amount thus reimbursed to each county must represent the total expenditure by an individual county for foster care and for alternative
services provided in conformance with the plan prepared and approved pursuant to subsections (2)(b) and (4) of this section.

(1.5) No later than July 1, 1994, each county in the state shall assure access to alternatives to out-of-home placements for families with children and youth who are at imminent risk of out-of-home placements. Beginning September 1, 2011, a county may
also provide access for families to alternative services to prevent continued involvement with the county department child welfare system. Beginning September 1, 2018, a county may also provide access to alternative services
for former foster care youth, as defined in section 26-5-101, who are no longer in the custody of the department but need limited assistance from the county. Two or more counties may jointly provide or purchase alternative
services to families in the respective counties. Such services shall either be provided for under the plan adopted by placement alternative commissions in accordance with subsection (2)(b) of this section or purchased by the
county if such county does not have a placement alternative commission for the county. If a county purchases alternative services, the county shall ensure that the services purchased meet the goals of placement alternative
commission plans, as described in subsection (2)(b)(I) of this section.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The county commissioners in each county may appoint a placement alternatives commission consisting, where possible, of a physician or a licensed health professional, an
attorney, representatives of a local law enforcement agency, representatives recommended by the court and probation department, representatives from the county department of human or social services, a local mental health
clinic, and the county, district, or municipal public health agency, a representative of a local school district specializing in special education, a representative of a local community centered board, representatives of
a local residential child care facility and a private nonprofit agency providing nonresidential services for children and families, a representative specializing in occupational training or employment programs, a foster
parent, and one or more representatives of the lay community. At least fifty percent of the commission members must represent the private sector. The county commissioners of two or more counties may jointly establish a
district placement alternatives commission. A placement alternatives commission may be consolidated with other local advisory boards pursuant to section 24-1.7-103.

(2)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.] The county commissioners in each county may appoint a placement alternatives commission consisting, where possible, of a physician or a licensed health professional, an
attorney, representatives of a local law enforcement agency, representatives recommended by the court and probation department, representatives from the county department of human or social services, a local mental
health clinic, and the county, district, or municipal public health agency, a representative of a local school district specializing in special education, a representative of a local case management agency, as defined
in section 25.5-6-1702, representatives of a local residential child care facility and a private nonprofit agency providing nonresidential services for children and families, a representative specializing in occupational
training or employment programs, a foster parent, and one or more representatives of the lay community. At least fifty percent of the commission members must represent the private sector. The county commissioners of
two or more counties may jointly establish a district placement alternatives commission. A placement alternatives commission may be consolidated with other local advisory boards pursuant to section 24-1.7-103.

On or before July 1, 1994, the commission, if established, shall annually prepare a plan for the provision of services. The primary goals under the plan shall be to prevent imminent placement of children out of the home and to reunite children who have
been placed out of the home with their families. If a county provides services to children who, without intervention, risk continued involvement with the child welfare system, the county shall include in the plan
the goals to be achieved by providing said services. The plan shall be prepared using all available sources of information in the community, including public hearings. The plan shall specify the nature of the expenditures
to be made and shall identify the services which are intended to prevent or minimize placement out of the home and to what extent. The plan shall contain, whenever practicable, a vocational component to provide
assistance to older children concerning a transition into the work force upon completion of school. Upon approval of the plan by the county commissioners, the counties shall submit the plan to the department of
human services.

On and after July 1, 1994, the commissions shall prepare multi-year plans for services which contain the same goals as described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), and the period for the plans shall be determined in state board rules. The multi-year
plans may be amended annually for budgetary or programmatic changes that are necessary to enhance service delivery or as otherwise deemed necessary to accomplish the goals of the plan, which reasons shall be set
forth in state board rules. Counties shall submit the multi-year plans for approval by the state board.

The commission shall review, on an ongoing basis, the effectiveness of programs within its jurisdiction which are designed to prevent or reduce placement and shall report its findings to the county commissioners annually.

Repealed.

Upon approval by the state board of human services of the plan submitted pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the department of human services shall reimburse county departments, as described in section 26-1-122, C.R.S., for eighty percent
of the expenditures made in conformance with the plan.

Repealed.

The departments of human services and education and the judicial department shall jointly develop guidelines for the content and submission of plans as described in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section. Said guidelines shall include but not
be limited to the information that is gathered by the commission, the goals to be addressed by the plan, the form of the budget for expenditures that are to be made under the plan, the services that are to be provided which
are intended to prevent or minimize placement out of the home and to reunite children with their families and to what extent, and the method by which the plan may be amended during the year to meet the changing local conditions;
except that amendments to the plan on and after July 1, 1994, shall be in accordance with subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section. On and after July 1, 1993, any amendments to the guidelines
shall be developed by the department of human services. Said guidelines shall then be submitted to the state board of human services, which shall promulgate rules for the submission of plans.

In addition to the duties described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the state board of human services is hereby authorized to develop through the adoption of rules categories of programs and services that promote the primary goals of the plan
established in accordance with paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section. Any plan established on and after July 1, 1994, shall provide for the availability and provision of services or programs within such categories.
Any plan established before July 1, 1994, shall be amended on or before that date to provide for the availability and provision of services or programs within such categories. The department of human services shall monitor
the implementation of the plans as approved by the state board.

Children currently residing in institutions whose condition would permit them to be discharged to less restrictive settings shall be so transferred at the earliest possible date. Moneys appropriated and available to the department of human services shall
be allocated on a priority basis by the department to county departments for the purposes of providing care to children who are discharged from the institution in which they reside if such children then receive care that is less
intensive, closer to the residence of the parents or family, or in a less restrictive setting.

It is the intent of the general assembly that state money appropriated for placements out of the home must not be used by county boards of human or social services for the development of new county-run programs or for the expansion of existing staff or
programs, if such development or expansion duplicates services already provided in the community, including, but not limited to, day care programs, independent living programs, home-based care, transitional care, alternative school
programs, counseling programs, street academies, tutorial programs, and in-home treatment and counseling programs.

Any county is hereby authorized to establish a program under which a multidisciplinary, noncategorical program fund for the county shall be created and moneys from such fund shall be used to provide child welfare services to at-risk children and their
families. Except as otherwise provided by federal law, the moneys in the county's fund contributed by state agencies shall be exempt from restrictive, categorical rules otherwise governing the use of such funds, including
the "M" notation in the state's annual appropriations act which describes the general and federal fund contributions for federally supported programs.

Such services shall include, but are not limited to, assessment, intervention, treatment, supervision, and shelter when and if appropriate.

The fund for each county must consist of contributions, made by any state, county, or local agency, of federal, state, or local funds appropriated to or contributed by such agencies for child welfare services for at-risk children and their families. Appropriated
funds include, but are not limited to, those appropriated to county departments of human or social services, the state department of human services, the department of public health and environment, the department
of education, the department of public safety, the judicial department, and the job training partnership office in the governor's office. Each state agency's contribution to a county's fund must be contingent upon
and equal to contributions from the participating county and any other local agency that participates and seeks money from the fund. Nothing in this subsection (7) allows the allocation of general fund money to
any other participating county in the same manner that such money is allocated to Mesa county in accordance with section 2 of House Bill 93-1171, as enacted during the first regular session of the fifty-ninth general
assembly.

The fund for each county may also consist of contributions from the fund of any other participating county.

The county board of human or social services for a county shall convene a meeting of the local and state agencies that provide child welfare services to at-risk children and their families, that will participate in the program, and that seek money from
the county's fund. The meeting is for the purpose of developing and adopting a memorandum of understanding between such agencies and the county's board of human or social services concerning the amount of contributions
to the fund described in subsection (7)(c) of this section and the allocation and use of money allocated from the fund. The memorandum of understanding must provide for the designation of a governing entity to oversee the
administration of the fund and a fiscal agent, a three-year plan, provisions for evaluating the programmatic and fiscal impact and overall effectiveness of the program, and a process for submitting the results of the evaluation
to the general assembly and state officials on an annual basis.

The state agencies affected by the implementation of the three-year plan described in subsection (7)(d) of this section shall review and approve the plan. The state agencies shall act on the plan within ninety days after the plan is submitted to the state
agencies. It is the intent of the general assembly that the plan be implemented and that the state agencies cooperate in the plan's development and implementation. Prior to the implementation of the program, a copy of the
approved plan must be submitted to the joint budget committee of the general assembly. Prior to the expiration of the three-year plan, the county board of human or social services shall follow the procedures described in
subsection (7)(d) of this section for readoption of or revisions to the three-year plan.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 707, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 90:
(1), (2)(b), (2)(e), and (3) amended and (2)(d) repealed, pp. 1013, 1015, §§ 1, 4, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(1.5) added and (2) and (4) amended, p. 2002, § 2, effective June 9; (7) added, p. 2095, § 1, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 1135, § 66, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:
(1), (2)(a), (2)(b)(I), (2)(e), (3), (4)(b), (5), and (7)(c) amended, pp. 2659, 2736, §§ 147, 363, effective July 1; (7) amended, p. 1798, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:
(2)(b)(I) amended, p. 82, § 3, effective March 20; (3) amended, p. 1256, § 143, effective August 7.

L. 97:
(2)(a) amended, p. 1191, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(3) amended, p. 729, § 16, effective May 18; (4)(a) amended, p. 821, § 23, effective August 5.

L. 2001:
(3) repealed, p. 1176, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2010:
(2)(a) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2075, § 35, effective August 11.

L. 2011:
(1.5) and (2)(b)(I) amended, (HB 11-1196), ch. 160, p. 553, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2018:
(1.5) amended, (HB 18-1319), ch. 217, p. 1391, § 4, effective May 18; (1), (2)(a), (6), (7)(c)(I), (7)(d), and (7)(e) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 408, § 31, effective August 8.

L. 2021:
(2)(a) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 326, § 7, effective July 1, 2024.

19-1-117. Visitation rights of grandparents or great-grandparents.

Any grandparent or great-grandparent of a child may, in the manner set forth in this section, seek a court order granting the grandparent or great-grandparent reasonable grandchild or great-grandchild visitation rights when there is or has been a child
custody case or a case concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities relating to that child. Because cases arise that do not directly deal with child custody or the allocation of parental responsibilities but nonetheless
have an impact on the custody of or parental responsibilities with respect to a child, for the purposes of this section, a "case concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to a child" includes any of the
following, whether or not child custody was or parental responsibilities were specifically an issue:

That the marriage of the child's parents has been declared invalid or has been dissolved by a court or that a court has entered a decree of legal separation with regard to such marriage;

That legal custody of or parental responsibilities with respect to the child have been given or allocated to a party other than the child's parent or that the child has been placed outside of and does not reside in the home of the child's parent, excluding
any child who has been placed for adoption or whose adoption has been legally finalized; or

That the child's parent, who is the child of the grandparent or grandchild of the great-grandparent, has died.

A party seeking a grandchild or great-grandchild visitation order shall submit, together with his or her motion for visitation, to the district court for the district in which the child resides an affidavit setting forth facts supporting the requested
order and shall give notice, together with a copy of his or her affidavit, to the party who has legal custody of the child or to the party with parental responsibilities as determined by a court pursuant to article 10 of title
14, C.R.S. The party with legal custody or parental responsibilities as determined by a court pursuant to article 10 of title 14, C.R.S., may file opposing affidavits. If neither party requests a hearing, the court shall enter
an order granting grandchild or great-grandchild visitation rights to the petitioning grandparent or great-grandparent only upon a finding that the visitation is in the best interests of the child. A hearing shall be held if either
party so requests or if it appears to the court that it is in the best interests of the child that a hearing be held. At the hearing, parties submitting affidavits shall be allowed an opportunity to be heard. If, at the conclusion
of the hearing, the court finds it is in the best interests of the child to grant grandchild or great-grandchild visitation rights to the petitioning grandparent or great-grandparent, the court shall enter an order granting such
rights.

A grandparent or great-grandparent shall not file an affidavit seeking an order granting grandchild or great-grandchild visitation rights more than once every two years absent a showing of good cause. If the court finds there is good cause to file more
than one such affidavit, it shall allow such additional affidavit to be filed and shall consider it. The court may order reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party. The court may not make any order restricting the movement
of the child if such restriction is solely for the purpose of allowing the grandparent or great-grandparent the opportunity to exercise his grandchild or great-grandchild visitation rights.

The court may make an order modifying or terminating grandchild or great-grandchild visitation rights whenever such order would serve the best interests of the child.

Any order granting or denying parenting time rights to the parent of a child shall not affect visitation rights granted to a grandparent or great-grandparent pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 709, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
(5) added, p. 262, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 93:
(5) amended, p. 581, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 98:
IP(1), (1)(b), and (2) amended, p. 1406, § 64, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2014:
IP(1), (1)(c), (2), (3), (4), and (5) amended, (HB 14-1362), ch. 374, p. 1787, § 2, effective June 6.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-1-116 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsection (5), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

19-1-117.5. Disputes concerning grandparent or great-grandparent visitation.

Upon a verified motion by a grandparent or great-grandparent who has been granted visitation or upon the court's own motion alleging that the person with legal custody or parental responsibilities of the child as determined by a court pursuant to article
10 of title 14, C.R.S., with whom visitation has been granted is not complying with a grandparent or great-grandparent visitation order or schedule, the court shall determine from the verified motion, and response to the motion,
if any, whether there has been or is likely to be a substantial and continuing noncompliance with the grandparent or great-grandparent visitation order or schedule and either:

Deny the motion, if there is an inadequate allegation; or

Set the matter for hearing with notice to the grandparent or great-grandparent and the person with legal custody or parental responsibilities of the child as determined by the court of the time and place of the hearing; or

Require said parties to seek mediation and report back to the court on the results of the mediation within sixty days. Mediation services shall be provided in accordance with section 13-22-305, C.R.S. At the end of the mediation period, the court may
approve an agreement reached by the parties or shall set the matter for hearing.

After the hearing, if a court finds that the person with legal custody or parental responsibilities of the child as determined by the court has not complied with the visitation order or schedule and has violated the court order, the court, in the best
interests of the child, may issue orders which may include but need not be limited to:

Imposing additional terms and conditions which are consistent with the court's previous order;

Modifying the previous order to meet the best interests of the child;

Requiring the violator to post bond or security to insure future compliance;

Requiring that makeup visitation be provided for the aggrieved grandparent or great-grandparent and child under the following conditions:

That such visitation is of the same type and duration of visitation as that which was denied, including but not limited to visitation during weekends, on holidays, and on weekdays and during the summer;

That such visitation is made up within one year after the noncompliance occurs;

That such visitation is in the manner chosen by the aggrieved grandparent or great-grandparent if it is in the best interests of the child;

Finding the person who did not comply with the visitation schedule in contempt of court and imposing a fine or jail sentence;

Awarding to the aggrieved party, where appropriate, actual expenses, including attorney fees, court costs, and expenses incurred by a grandparent or great-grandparent because of the other person's failure to provide or exercise court-ordered visitation.
Nothing in this section shall preclude a party's right to a separate and independent legal action in tort.

Source:

L. 91:
Entire section added, p. 262, § 4, effective May 31.

L. 98:
IP(1), (1)(b), and IP(2) amended, p. 1407, § 65, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2014:
IP(1), (1)(b), IP(2)(d), (2)(d)(III), and (2)(f) amended, (HB 14-1362), ch. 374, p. 1788, § 3, effective June 6.

19-1-117.6. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:
Entire section added, p. 262, § 4, effective May 31.

L. 96:
Entire section repealed, p. 85, § 11, effective March 20.

19-1-117.7. Requests for placement - legal custody by grandparents.

Whenever a grandparent seeks the placement of his or her grandchild in the grandparent's home or seeks the legal custody of his or her grandchild pursuant to the provisions of this title, the court entering such order shall consider any credible evidence
of the grandparent's past conduct of child abuse or neglect. Such evidence may include, but shall not be limited to, medical records, school records, police reports, information contained in records and reports of child abuse or neglect,
and court records received by the court pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(f).

Source:

L. 91:
Entire section added, p. 262, § 4, effective May 31.

L. 2003:
Entire section amended, p. 1401, § 6, effective January 1, 2004.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 196, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

19-1-118. Court records - inspection. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 710, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(4) and (5) added, p. 914, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:
Entire section repealed, p. 1012, § 8, effective July 1.

19-1-119. Confidentiality of juvenile records - delinquency. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:
Entire section added, p. 1007, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:
IP(1)(a) amended and (1)(b.5) added, p. 205, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:
Entire section amended, p. 932, § 2, effective May 28; (1)(a), (1)(b), and (2)(a) amended, p. 1547, § 3, effective July 1; (1)(a)(VII) amended, p. 969, § 5, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 453, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 93, 1st Ex. Sess.:
(1)(b.5) amended, p. 36, § 1, effective September 13.

L. 94:
(1)(b.5), IP(1)(c)(II), IP(2)(a), and (5) amended and (1)(b.7) added, p. 910, § 6, effective April 28; (1)(a)(X), (1)(a)(XIII)(A), (1)(c)(V), (2)(a)(X), (2)(a)(XIV)(A), and (6) amended, p. 2661, § 148, effective July 1.

L. 96:
(1)(a)(XIV) added, p. 1585, § 8, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1173, § 7, effective January 1, 1997.

Editor's note:
This section was relocated to § 19-1-304 in 1997.

19-1-120. Confidentiality of records - dependency and neglect. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:
Entire section added, (2)(k) and (2)(k)(I) amended, and (2)(l) added, pp. 1009, 1031, 1845, §§ 2, 21, 27, effective July 1; (2)(j) amended, p. 1845, § 37, effective October 1.

L. 91:
(2)(k) amended and (2)(m) to (2)(o) and (2.5) added, pp. 221, 222, §§ 1, 2, effective May 24.

L. 92:
(2)(a) amended, p. 406, § 21, effective June 3; (2)(a) amended, p. 1103, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(2)(k) and (2)(l) amended, p. 1779, § 42, effective June 6.

L. 94:
(2)(p) added, p. 2084, § 3, effective June 3; (2)(k), IP(2)(m), and (2)(o) amended, p. 2662, § 149, effective July 1.

L. 96:
(2)(q) added and (2.5) amended, p. 1586, §§ 9, 10, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1173, § 7, effective January 1, 1997.

Editor's note:
This section was relocated to § 19-1-307 in 1997.

19-1-121. Confidentiality of records - "Uniform Parentage Act". (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:
Entire section added, p. 1011, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:
Entire section amended, p. 1540, § 12, effective May 31.

L. 96:
Entire section repealed, p. 1173, § 7, effective January 1, 1997.

Editor's note:
This section was relocated to § 19-1-308 in 1997.

19-1-122. Confidentiality of records - relinquishments and adoptions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:
Entire section added, p. 1011, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:
Entire section amended, p. 656, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:
Entire section repealed, p. 1173, § 7, effective January 1, 1997.

Editor's note:
This section was relocated to § 19-1-309 in 1997.

19-1-123. Expedited procedures for permanent placement - children under the age of six years - designated counties.

The expedited procedures for the permanent placement of children under the age of six years required by article 3 of this title 19 must be implemented on a county-by-county basis beginning July 1, 1994. The state department of human services, in consultation
with the judicial department and the governing boards of each county department of human or social services, shall have the responsibility for establishing an implementation schedule that provides for statewide implementation
of such expedited procedures by June 30, 2004. A designated county is required to implement the expedited procedures on and after the implementation date applicable to the county as specified in the implementation schedule
for each new case filed in the county involving a child who is under six years of age at the time a petition is filed in accordance with section

19-3-501 (2)

.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 73, § 1, effective March 10, 2000.)

The implementation of expedited procedures in additional counties shall be subject to specific appropriation by the general assembly or by determination by a county that no additional resources are needed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 193, § 6, effective August 4, 2004.)

Source:

L. 94:
Entire section added, p. 2052, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(2)(a) amended, p. 730, § 17, effective May 18.

L. 2000:
(1)(b) and (2)(a) amended, p. 73, § 1, effective March 10.

L. 2004:
(2) amended, p. 193, § 6, effective August 4.

L. 2018:
(1)(a) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 409, § 32, effective August 8.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-1-124. Providers of children's services using federal or state moneys - use of state accounting standards.

In order to ensure financial accountability, on and after July 1, 1997, all service providers receiving federal or state moneys through the state for the provision of services to children, youth, and families pursuant to this title shall use the accounting
standards of the governmental accounting standards board.

Source:

L. 96:
Entire section added, p. 1155, § 5, effective January 1, 1997.

19-1-125. Family stabilization services.

It is the intent of the general assembly to assist in the provision of appropriate and necessary short-term services to help stabilize families that are at risk of having their children placed in out-of-home placement when those families voluntarily request
such services. It is further the intent of the general assembly that county departments provide for family stabilization services through contracts with private or nonprofit organizations or entities whenever possible.

Repealed.

County departments shall use any moneys allocated pursuant to this section to provide for family stabilization services, defined by rule of the state board of human services, that may include but not be limited to:

Less than twenty-four-hour respite care for parents and children;

In-home services that may include kinship care and counseling; or

Services that assist the family to reintegrate following a separation or out-of-home placement.

Source:

L. 2001:
Entire section added, p. 739, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2002:
(1) and (2) amended, p. 528, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2003:
(2) amended, p. 386, § 1, effective March 5.

L. 2004:
(2)(d) added, p. 1555, § 3, effective May 28.

Editor's note:
Subsection (2)(d)(I) provided for the repeal of subsection (2), effective July 1, 2006. (See L. 2004, p. 1555.)